src/fst/root.lexd
# Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Hiligaynon language
# Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
# http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
# this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
# is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
# also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
#
# Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
# giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

# ========================================================================== #
# ##            ###Hiligaynon morphological analyser                      #
# ========================================================================== #
## INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Hiligaynon LANGUAGE.

PATTERNS
## The word forms in Hiligaynon language start from the lexeme roots of basic
## word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
    Articles ## TODO Change this throughout to Particles
    Nouns
    Verbs
    Adjectives
    Pronouns
    #Numerals
    #Prefixes
    Prepositions
    #Punctuation # TODO: These are automatically generated in lexc?
    #Symbols
